Utah statutes.
41-3-104.   Division creation -- Administrator appointed.

(1)  There is created within the commission the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division with the powers and duties provided in this chapter.

(2)  The division shall be administered by the motor vehicle enforcement administrator.

(3)  The administrator shall be appointed by the commission and is subject to the commission's supervision and direction.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1992 General Session

